test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_kaandas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kaandâš: # to be checked
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Nom:  kaandâš
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Gen:  kandii
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Acc:  kandii
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Ill:  [ka´ndâžân, kandij]
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Loc:  kandiist
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Com:  kandijn
    kaandâš+N+Sg+Abe:  kandiittáá
    kaandâš+N+Ess:  [ka´ndâžin, kandin]
    kaandâš+N+Par:  [ka´ndâžid, kandid]
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Nom:  kandiih
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Gen:  kandij
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Acc:  kandijd
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Ill:  kandijd
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Loc:  kandijn
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Com:  kandijguin
    kaandâš+N+Pl+Abe:  kandijttáá
    
  Noun - kieđâš: # to be checked
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Nom:  kieđâš
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Gen:  kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Acc:  kieđii
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Ill:  kieđâžân
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Loc:  kieđiist
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Com:  kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Sg+Abe:  kieđiittáá
    kieđâš+N+Ess:  kieđâžin
    kieđâš+N+Par:  kieđâžid
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Nom:  kieđiih
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Gen:  kieđij
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Acc:  kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Ill:  kieđijd
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Loc:  kieđijn
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Com:  kieđijguin
    kieđâš+N+Pl+Abe:  kieđijttáá    

  Noun - kuusâš: # to be checked
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Nom:  kuusâš
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Gen:  kussii
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Acc:  kussii
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Ill:  kuˊsâžân
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Loc:  kussiist
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Com:  kussijn
    kuusâš+N+Sg+Abe:  kussiittáá
    kuusâš+N+Ess:  kusâžin
    kuusâš+N+Par:  kusâžid
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Nom:  kussiih
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Gen:  kussij
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Acc:  kussijd
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Ill:  kussijd
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Loc:  kussijn
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Com:  kussijguin
    kuusâš+N+Pl+Abe:  kussijttáá
    
  
